Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Subarticle D. Reorganization and Termination

§ 17-17-130.
Merger, consolidation, share exchange and sale of assets.

A plan of merger, consolidation or share exchange that:

If effected would terminate statutory close corporation status must be approved by the holders of at least two-thirds (2/3) of the votes of each class or series of shares of the statutory close corporation, voting as separate voting groups, whether or not the holders are otherwise entitled to vote on the plan;

If effected would create the surviving or new corporation as a statutory close corporation must be approved by the holders of at least two-thirds (2/3) of the votes of each class or series of shares of the surviving corporation, voting as separate voting groups, whether or not the holders are otherwise entitled to vote on the plan.

A sale, lease, exchange, mortgage, encumbrance or other disposition of all or substantially all of the property, with or without the good will, of a statutory close corporation, if not made in the usual and regular course of business, must be approved by the holders of at least two-thirds (2/3) of the votes of each class or series of shares of the corporation, voting as separate voting groups, whether or not the holders are otherwise entitled to vote on the transaction.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 201, § 1.

§ 17-17-131.
Termination of statutory close corporation status.

A statutory close corporation may terminate its statutory close corporation status by amending its articles of incorporation to delete the statement that it is a statutory close corporation. If the statutory close corporation has elected to operate without a board of directors under W.S.

17-17-121

, the amendment must either comply with W.S.

17-16-801

or delete the statement dispensing with the board of directors from its articles of incorporation.

An amendment terminating statutory close corporation status must be approved by the holders of at least two-thirds (2/3) of the votes of each class or series of shares of the corporation, voting as separate voting groups, whether or not the holders are otherwise entitled to vote on amendments.

If an amendment to terminate statutory close corporation status is adopted, each shareholder who voted against the amendment is entitled to assert dissenters’ rights under W.S.

17-16-1301

through

17-16-1331

.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 201, § 1.

§ 17-17-132.
Effect of termination of statutory close corporation status.

A corporation that terminates its status as a statutory close corporation is thereafter subject to all provisions of the Wyoming Business Corporation Act and, if incorporated under W.S.

17-3-101

through

17-3-104

, to all provisions of those statutes.

Termination of statutory close corporation status does not affect any right of a shareholder or of the corporation under an agreement or the articles of incorporation unless this chapter, the Wyoming Business Corporation Act, or another law of this state invalidates the right.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 201, § 1.

Cross references. —

For provisions of the Wyoming Business Corporation Act, see §

17-16-101

et seq.

§ 17-17-133.
Shareholder option to dissolve corporation.

The articles of incorporation of a statutory close corporation may authorize one (1) or more shareholders, or the holders of a specified number or percentage of shares of any class or series, to dissolve the corporation at will or upon the occurrence of a specified event or contingency. The shareholder or shareholders exercising this authority must give written notice of the intent to dissolve to all the other shareholders. Sixty (60) days after the effective date of the notice, the corporation shall begin to wind up and liquidate its business and affairs and file articles of dissolution under W.S.

17-16-1403

through

17-16-1407

.

Unless the articles of incorporation provide otherwise, an amendment to the articles of incorporation to add, change or delete the authority to dissolve described in subsection (a) of this section must be approved by the holders of all the outstanding shares, whether or not otherwise entitled to vote on amendments, or if no shares have been issued, by all the subscribers for shares, if any, or if none, by all the incorporators.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 201, § 1.